Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
659

QUO
WARRANTO

Section

659-1 Definition

659-2 Against corporations, by attorney general

659-3 Forfeiture of franchise

659-4 Petition

659-5 Answer

659-6 Judgment as to offices; burden of proof

659-7 Judgment according to nature of complaint

659-8 Service

659-9 Corporations not liable to writ, when

659-10 Other actions

Note

This chapter, formerly entitled Extraordinary Legal Remedies,
was completely revised by L 1972, c 90, §3. The sections of the chapter are
renumbered as set forth below. The following table shows the current
disposition of the chapter.

DISPOSITION TABLE

__________________________________________________________

HRS (1968) Herein

__________________________________________________________

659-1 to 9 R

659-16 to 24 R

659-31 to 40 R

659-46 659-1

659-47 659-2

659-47.5 659-3

659-48 659-4

659-49 659-5

659-50 R

659-51 659-6

659-52 659-7

659-53 659-8

659-54 659-9

659-55 659-10

Rules of Court

Applicability of Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure, see HRCP
rule 81(b)(4).

Case Notes

Relief previously available by mandamus may be obtained by
appropriate action under the civil rules of procedure. 54 H. 274, 506 P.2d 8.

Trial court properly dismissed quo warranto petition against
Maui corporation counsel as moot. 73 H. 223, 832 P.2d 253.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next